Hawaii, session 2026, GM1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that supporting state
businesses strengthens the State's economy by creating local
employment, expanding workforce and business capacity, and
enhancing economic sustainability. The legislature further
finds that public procurement is a significant exercise of the
State's purchasing power and, when expending its own funds, the
State acts as a market participant.
The legislature recognizes that local preference programs
within the public procurement code have been adopted in numerous
jurisdictions. However, aggressive percentage preferences may
increase litigation risk under the dormant commerce clause,
equal protection clause, and related constitutional doctrines.
Therefore, the legislature determines that adopting a
modest and carefully structured preference percentage, with
clear verification standards, reciprocity provisions, and
federal funding limitations, will promote local economic
2026-2517 SB2075 GDI SMA.docx
iiuiiiiiiiiiiiiiHniiiiiii

S.B. NO. S?i
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
development while reducing the likelihood of undue court action
that could invalidate the program in its entirety.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to adopt a
moderate, capped, and administratively verifiable five per cent
evaluation preference, limited in scope and accompanied by clear
certification, verification, enforcement, and reciprocity
provisions, to promote in-state economic participation while
preserving fairness, transparency, and fiscal responsibility in
the procurement process.
SECTION 2. Section 103D-302, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§103D-302 Competitive sealed bidding. (a) Contracts
shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding except as
otherwise provided in section 103D-301. Awards of contracts by
competitive sealed bidding may be made after single or
multi-step bidding. Competitive sealed bidding does not include
negotiations with bidders after the receipt and opening of bids.
Award is based on the criteria set forth in the invitation for
bids.
(b) An invitation for bids shall be issued, and shall
include a purchase description and all contractual terms and
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
IIIIIIMinHIIIIIIIIilMIII

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
conditions applicable to the procurement. If the invitation for
bids is for construction, it shall specify that all bids include
the name of each person or firm to be engaged by the bidder as a
joint contractor or subcontractor in the performance of the
contract and the nature and scope of the work to be performed by
each. Construction bids that do not comply with this
requirement may be accepted if acceptance is in the best
interest of the State and the value of the work to be performed
by the joint contractor or subcontractor is equal to or less
than one per cent of the total bid amount.
(c) Adequate public notice of the invitation for bids
shall be given a reasonable time before the date set forth in
the invitation for the opening of bids. The policy board shall
adopt rules which specify:
(1) The form that the notice is to take;
(2) What constitutes a reasonable interim between
publication^ and bid opening; and
(3) How notice may be published, including publication in
a newspaper of general circulation, notice by mail to
all persons on any applicable bidders mailing list,
publication by any public or private telecommunication
2026-2517 SB2075 GDI SMA.docx 3
iHmiNiiiiiniHigiiiiiHiii

Page 4 2075
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
information network, or any other method of
publication it deems to be effective.
(d) Bids shall be opened publicly in the presence of one
or more witnesses, at the time and place designated in the
invitation for bids. The amount of each bid and other relevant
information specified by rule, together with the name of each
bidder shall be recorded. The record and each bid shall be open
to public inspection.
(e) Bids shall be unconditionally accepted without
alteration or correction, except as authorized in this chapter
or by rules adopted by the policy board.
(f) Bids shall be evaluated based on the requirements set
forth in the invitation for bids. These requirements may
include criteria to determine acceptability2_ such as inspection,
testing, quality, workmanship, delivery, and suitability for a
particular purpose. [Those] The criteria that will affect the
bid price and be considered in evaluation for award shall be as
objectively measurable as possible, such as discounts,
transportation costs, total or life cycle costs, and the
bidder's past performance, if available. The invitation for
bids shall set forth the evaluation criteria to be used. No
2026-2517 SB2075 GDI SMA.docx
iiiuiiiiliiiiiiiiiiniiHiiii

S.B. NO.
• • h.D. 2
C.D. 1
criteria may be used in bid evaluation that are not set forth in
the invitation for bids.
(g) Correction or withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous
bids before or after award, or cancellation of invitations for
bids, awards, or contracts based on such bid mistakes, shall be
permitted in accordance with rules adopted by the policy board.
After bid opening^ no changes in bid prices or other provisions
of bids prejudicial to the interest of the public or to fair
competition shall be permitted. Except as otherwise provided by
rule, all decisions to permit the correction or withdrawal of
bids, or to cancel awards or contracts based on bid mistakes,
shall be supported by a written determination made by the chief
procurement officer or head of a purchasing agency.
(h) The contract shall be awarded with reasonable
promptness by written notice to the lowest responsible and
responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and criteria
set forth in the invitation for bids. In the event all bids
exceed available funds as certified by the appropriate fiscal
officer, the head of the purchasing agency responsible for the
procurement in question is authorized^ in situations where time
or economic considerations preclude resolicitation of work of a
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
liUHIIIIIIDinilMIIUIIMIIIM

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
reduced scope2_ to negotiate an adjustment of the bid price,
including changes in the bid requirements, with the low
responsible and responsive bidder, in order to bring the bid
within the amount of available funds.
(i) When it is not practicable to initially prepare a
purchase description to support an award based on price, an
invitation for bids, which requests the submission of unpriced
offers to be followed by an invitation for bids limited to those
bidders whose offers have been qualified under the criteria set
forth in the first solicitation, may be used. If a multi-step
sealed bidding process is used, the notice and the invitation
for bids shall describe each step to be used in soliciting,
evaluating, and selecting unpriced offers.
(j) Hawaii bidder preference. For evaluation purposes
only, when a responsible and responsive bidder qualifies as a
Hawaii bidder and submits a Hawaii bidder preference
certification at or before the time set for bid opening, the bid
price shall be deemed reduced by five per cent; provided that;
(1) The total preference amount shall not exceed $500,000;
(2) The preference;
(A) ShaJJ^ap£lj^^only when2.
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
iHiiniiuHiiiiiniiiiiMiiH

Page 7
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
The total bid price is less than
$10,000,000;
(ii) Application of the preference does not
conflict with federal law or regulation or a
condition for the allocation of federal
funds to the procurement; and
JJ^i^ A Hawaii bidder competes against a bidder
that does not qualify as a Hawaii bidder;
and
(B) Shall not be applied between two Hawaii bidders;
(3) Award of contract shall be made at the original bid
price and not at the reduced evaluated price;
(4) A bidder receiving a preference pursuant to this
subsection shall certify, under penalty of perjury,
that:
(A) Not less than fifty-one per cent of the total
direct labor hours required for performance of
the contract will be performed within the State;
a^
The bidder will maintain qualification as a
Hawaii bidder throughout contract performance;
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
iHHniiiiimiMnHiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO. X
C.D. 1
(5) Bef£r^awaTd of a contTa£t^t^a^idder^.eceiylng a
preference pursuant to this subsection^ the
procurement officer shall verify that the bidder
satisfies all eligibility requirements; provided that
any bidder who does not satisfy the requirements shall
be given a reasonable time to cure the deficiency;
(6) Failure to maintain qualification as a Hawaii bidder
shall subject the contract to price adjustment equal
to the value of the preference applied and may
constitute cause for debarment pursuant to section
103D-702; and
(7) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority
of the chief procurement officer to apply a reciprocal
preference against a nonresident bidder pursuant to
section 103D-1004.
For the purposes of this subsection, "Hawaii bidder" and
"Hawaii bidder preference certification” have the same meanings
as those terms are defined in section 103D-1Q01."
SECTION 3. Section 103D-303, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
llllllinilMHIIIinHIIIIIMMIIII

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"§103D-303 Competitive sealed proposals. (a) Competitive
sealed proposals may be used to procure goods, services, or
construction that are [ei-fehee] not practicable or not
advantageous to the State to procure by competitive sealed
bidding.
(b) Proposals shall be solicited through a request for
proposals.
(c) Notice of the request for proposals shall be given in
the same manner as provided in section 103D-302(c).
(d) Proposals shall be opened so as to avoid disclosure of
contents to competing offerors during the process of evaluation.
A register of proposals shall be prepared and shall be open for
public inspection after contract award.
(e) The request for proposals shall include as an
evaluation factor, past performance on projects of similar scope
for public agencies or private industry, and shall state the
relative importance of price, past performance, and other
evaluation factors.
(f) Discussions may be conducted with responsible offerors
who submit proposals determined to be reasonably likely to be
selected for a contract award for the purpose of clarification
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx
IIIMMigilHIDMHIliiNII

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
to assure full understanding of, and responsiveness to, the
solicitation requirements. Offerors shall be accorded fair and
equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion
and revision of proposals, and revisions may be permitted after
submissions and prior to award for the purpose of obtaining best
and final offers. In conducting discussions, there shall be no
disclosure of any information derived from proposals submitted
by competing offerors.
(g) Award shall be made to the responsible offeror whose
proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous,
taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set
forth in the request for proposals. No other factors or
criteria shall be used in the evaluation. The contract file
shall contain the basis on which the award is made.
(h) In cases of awards made under this section, non­
selected offerors may submit a written request for debriefing to
the procurement officer within three working days after the
posting of the award of the contract. Thereafter, the
procurement officer shall provide the non-selected offeror a
prompt debriefing. Any protest by the non-selected offeror
pursuant to section 103D-701 following debriefing shall be filed
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 1
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiininiiiiiii

Page 11 2075
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
in writing with the procurement officer within five working days
after the date upon which the debriefing is completed.
(i) In addition to any other provisions of this section,
construction projects may be solicited through a request for
proposals to use the design-build method; provided that:
(1) A request for proposals is issued to prequalify
offerors to select a short list, of [fte] not more than
three responsible offerors[7—prior to] before the
submittal of proposals; provided that the number of
offerors to be selected for the short list shall be
stated in the request for proposals and prompt notice
is given to all offerors as to which offerors have
been short-listed;
(2) A conceptual design fee may be paid to non-selected
offerors that submit a technically responsive
proposal; provided that the cost of the entire project
is greater than $1,000,000;
(3) The criteria for pre-qualification of offerors, design
requirements, development documents, proposal
evaluation criteria, terms of the payment of a
conceptual design fee, or any other pertinent
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 11
iiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiioiHiii

Page 12
S.B. NO.
■ ■ h.D. 2
C.D. 1
information shall be stated in the request for
proposals; and
(4) Past performance on projects of similar scope for
public agencies or private industries shall be an
evaluation factor for the prequalification of
offerors.
(j) Hawaii offeror preference. For evaluation purposes
only, when a responsible offeror qualifies as a Hawaii offeror
and submits a Hawaii offeror preference certification at or
before the time set for receipt of proposals, the proposal price
shall be deemed reduced by five per cent; provided that:
(1) The total preference amount shall not exceed $500,000;
(2) The preference:
(A) Shall apply only when:
(i) The total contract value is less than
$10,000,000;
Ji^ Application of the preference does not
conflict with federal law or regulation or a
condition for the allocation of federal
funds to the procurement; and
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 12
iiiiiGiuiiiniiiiiiiiiEaiuliiiiiii

Page 13
S.B. NO.
• h.D. 2
C.D. 1
(iii) A Hawaii offeror competes against an offeror
that does not qualify as a Hawaii offeror;
a^
(B) Shall not be applied between two Hawaii offerors;
(3) Award of contract shall be made at the original
contract price and not at the reduced evaluated price;
(4) An offeror receiving a preference pursuant to this
subsection shall certify, under penalty of perjury,
that:
(A) Not less than fifty-one per cent of the total
direct labor hours required for performance of
the contract will be performed within the State;
ai^
(B) The offeror will maintain qualification as a
Hawaii offeror throughout contract performance;
(5) Before award of a contract to an offeror receiving a
preference pursuant to this subsection, the
procurement officer shall verify that the offeror
satisfies all eligibility requirements; provided that
any offeror who does not satisfy the requirements
2026-2517 SB2075 GDI SMA.docx 13
MIIHinilHIIMIIIHafW

Page 14
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
shall be given a reasonable time to cure the
deficiency;
(6) Failure to maintain qualification as a Hawaii offeror
shall subject the contract to price adjustment equal
to the value of the preference applied and may
constitute cause for debarment pursuant to section
103D-702; and
(7) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority
of the chief procurement officer to apply a reciprocal
preference against a nonresident offeror pursuant to
section 103D-1004.
For the purposes of this subsection, "Hawaii offeror” and
"Hawaii offeror preference certification" have the same meanings
as these terms are defined in section 103D-1001."
SECTION 4. Section 103D-702, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The causes for debarment or suspension include the
following:
(1) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an
incident to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 14
iiiiiNininNHMiiHuiinnHg

Page 15 S.B. NO. X
C.D. 1
or private contract or subcontract, or in the
performance of the contract or subcontract;
(2) Conviction under state or federal statutes relating to
embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification
or destruction of records, receiving stolen property,
or any other offense indicating a lack of business
integrity or business honesty which currently,
seriously, and directly affects responsibility as a
contractor;
(3) Conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes
arising out of the submission of bids or proposals;
(4) Violation of contract provisions, as set forth below,
of a character that is regarded by the chief
procurement officer to be so serious as to justify
debarment action:
(A) Deliberate failure without good cause to perform
in accordance with the specifications or within
the time limit provided in the contract; or
(B) A recent record of failure to perform or of
unsatisfactory performance in accordance with the
terms of one or more contracts; provided that
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 1
iMiiiiiiiiiiiiHiimini

Page 16 2075
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance
caused by acts beyond the control of the
contractor shall not be considered to be a basis
for debarment;
(5) Knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false or
misleading statement or certification of material fact
for the purposes of obtaining or retaining a
preference under section 103D-302(j) or 103D-303(j);
(6) Any other cause the chief procurement officer
determines to be so serious and compelling as to
affect responsibility as a contractor, including
debarment by another governmental entity for any cause
listed in the rules of the policy board; and
[4-6-)-] (7) Violation of the ethical standards set forth in
chapter 84 and its implementing rules, or the charters
and ordinances of the several counties and their
implementing rules."
SECTION 5. Section 103D-1001, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding four new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Hawaii bidder" means any person that:
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 16
iiiiniiiniiHMiiiniHigiii

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Holds a valid commercial place of business in the
State that has been staffed by the person or an
employee of the person for not less than two
consecutive years immediately preceding the time and
date set for the opening of bids;
(2) Submits a bid under the name under which the person is
authorized to do business in the State; and
(3) If a joint venture, is composed entirely of persons
meeting the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).
For the purposes of this definition, "person" includes an
agency, corporation, and other business entity.
"Hawaii bidder preference certification" means a sworn
statement executed under penalty of perjury by an authorized
representative of a bidder attesting to eligibility for the
Hawaii bidder preference established under section 103D-302(j)
and agreeing to maintain qualification throughout contract
performance.
"Hawaii offeror" means any person that;
(1) Holds a valid commercial place of business in the
State that has been staffed by the person or an
employee of the person for not less than two
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 1
IINHiUlHIIIHIIMNilHIIIIM

Page 18
S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
consecutive years iminediately preceding the time and
date set for the receipt of proposals;
(2) Submits a proposal under the name under which the
person is authorized to do business in the State; and
(3) If a joint venture, is composed entirely of persons
meeting the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).
For the purposes of this definition, "person" includes an
agency, corporation, and other business entity.
"Hawaii offeror preference certification" means a sworn
statement executed under penalty of perjury by an authorized
representative of an offeror, attesting to eligibility for the
Hawaii offeror preference established under section 103D-303(j)
and agreeing to maintain qualification throughout contract
performance."
SECTION 6. Section 103D-1002, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§103D-1002 Hawaii products. (a) This section shall only
apply to bids and proposals for agricultural goods, value-added
products, and commodities. A purchasing agency shall review all
specifications in a bid or proposal for purchase of Hawaii
products where these products are available and where
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 18

Page 19
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
procurement of these products will promote the State's goal of
increasing agricultural production and sustainability.
(b) All invitations for bids and requests for proposals to
which this section applies shall:
(1) Include a description of the products that are listed
in the Hawaii products list established pursuant to
this section, which may be used to complete the scope
of work specified in the invitation for bids or
request for proposals; or
(2) Allow as part of the offer, self-certification that
the Hawaii products qualify for preference;
provided that the offer may be evaluated along with any other
published criteria in the solicitation, including but not
limited to considerations [auoh&&] of specific nutritional
content or its equivalent, timing of delivery, quality or
freshness, and past performance, if applicable.
All Hawaii products in any bid or request for proposal
shall be made available for inspection, or additional
information may be requested to verify that the Hawaii product
meets the minimum specifications.
2026-2517 SB2075 GDI SMA.docx 19
iiiiniiiMiiiiiiiiniHiiiiiiH

Page 20
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) All persons submitting bids or proposals to claim a
Hawaii products preference shall designate in their bids which
individual product and its price is to be supplied as a Hawaii
product.
(d) Where a bid or proposal contains both Hawaii and
non-Hawaii products, then for the purpose of selecting the
lowest bid or purchase price only, the price or bid offered for
a Hawaii product item shall be decreased by subtracting ten per
cent for class I Hawaii product items bid or offered, or fifteen
per cent for class II Hawaii product items bid or offered. The
lowest total bid or proposal, taking the preference into
consideration, shall be awarded the contract unless the bid or
offer provides for additional award criteria. The contract
amount of any contract awarded, however, shall be the amount of
the bid or price offered, exclusive of the preferences.
(e) Upon receipt and approval of application for Hawaii
products preference, the administrator shall include within the
Hawaii products list[—] the names of producers and manufacturers
in the State who are authorized to supply locally manufactured
soil enhancement products to state agencies under subsection
[(1).] (m). The administrator of the state procurement office
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 20
uiiimiHiiiDiiiiiiiniii

Page 21
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
shall maintain and distribute copies of the list to the
purchasing agencies of the various governmental agencies.
(f) Any person not on the Hawaii products list desiring a
preference pursuant to this section shall certify the Hawaii
product when submitting a response to a solicitation; provided
that the person certifies under penalty of sanctions that the
offered Hawaii products meet the requirements for the
preference.
The procurement officer may request additional information
deemed necessary to qualify a product and shall have sole
discretion in determining qualification for the preference.
Any offeror whose product is deemed not qualified for the
preference may appeal by filing a written request for
reexamination of facts to the procurement officer. Upon
determining that the offeror is qualified for the preference,
the procurement officer shall notify the administrator and the
administrator shall place the offeror on the Hawaii products
list.
(g) Solicitations shall contain a provision notifying
offerors who request application of the preference that^ in the
event of any change that materially alters the offeror's ability
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 2
HMinilBIIIIHIIIIIIinillB

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
to supply Hawaii products, the offeror shall immediately notify
the chief procurement officer in writing and the parties shall
enter into discussions for the purposes of revising the contract
or terminating the contract for convenience.
(h) Nothing in this section shall limit, restrict, or
preclude a Hawaii product from any preferences, set-asides, or
criteria that may be applied under section 103D-906, and this
section shall operate instead to mutually enhance the purpose of
this section and section 103D-906.
(i) This section shall not apply when at least one of the
following conditions is met:
(1) Its application will disqualify any governmental
agency from receiving federal funds or aid; or
(2) The solicitation is for public works construction.
(j) Any purchase made or any contract awarded or executed
in violation of this section shall be void and no payment shall
be made by any purchasing agency on account of the purchase or
contract.
(k) The department of accounting and general services
shall provide written notice to all vendors of construction
products who are registered on the Hawaii products list with the
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiiwMiiBiniiiimiiiiDiiii

Page 23
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
state procurement office regarding any amendments to this
section, including effective dates and dates of repeal.
(1) The policy board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to implement the Hawaii bidder preference and Hawaii
offeror preference established under sections 103D-302(j) and
103D-303(j), respectively, including;
(1) Standardized certification forms;
(2) Verification procedures and documentation standards;
(3) Audit and compliance monitoring procedures;
(4) Methods for calculating direct labor hours; and
(5) Procedures for enforcement referral.
[4-i-)-] For the purposes of this section, "soil
enhancement product" means any nonchemical soil preparation,
conditioner, or compost mixture designed to supplement aeration
or add organic, green waste, or decaying matter to the soil.
"Soil enhancement product" does not include any plant fertilizer
intended to stimulate or induce plant growth through chemical
means. All state agencies shall include in their solicitations,
when required, the soil enhancement products identified on the
Hawaii products list pursuant to subsection (e)."
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 23
liimiininiiniimiiini

Page 24
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2517 SB2075 CDl SMA.docx 24
niiiiiMiiiniiiniiiiiii

S.B. NO. SS?,
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2026

S.B. No. 2075, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
229-26

SB No. 2075, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives